Vermont, session 2025-2026, S327.
It is hereby enacted by the General Assembly of the State of Vermont:
Sec. 1. [Deleted.]
Sec. 2. [Deleted.]
Sec. 3. [Deleted.]
Sec. 4. [Deleted.]
Sec. 5. [Deleted.]
Sec. 6. [Deleted.]
* * * Business Resources and Growth Study * * *
Sec. 7. BUSINESS RESOURCES AND GROWTH; INVENTORY; STUDY;
REPORT
(a) Business growth and development study. The Commissioner of
Economic Development, in consultation with the stakeholders set forth in
subsection (b) of this section, for the purpose of determining how the State can
better enable and support the growth of Vermont businesses, shall:
(1) clearly define each stage of business development in order to provide
business leaders, investors, and the General Assembly with an understanding
of the resources businesses need at each stage of development;
(2) identify the public and private resources available to businesses and
determine how the resources are currently communicated to businesses;
VT LEG #390172 v.1

No. 128 Page 2 of 32
2026
(3) create an inventory of resources, pursuant to subdivision (2) of this
subsection, that are poised to serve businesses for each stage of development;
(4) determine how best to communicate the inventory of resources
created pursuant to subdivision (3) of this subsection to Vermonters and the
business community;
(5) determine how to better communicate succession planning options
for businesses;
(6) identify what resources are available to businesses to access capital;
(7) determine the state of capital access opportunities, including the:
(A) investment environment in Vermont and the New England
region;
(B) availability of tax credits to leverage private capital; and
(C) requirements to maintain Vermont’s Tech Hub designation; and
(8) identify investor education opportunities for high net worth
individuals interested in investing in Vermont businesses.
(b) Stakeholders. The Commissioner shall consult and convene with
stakeholders to assist in the Commissioner’s work pursuant to subsection (a) of
this section that have relevant experience in business growth and access to
capital, including representation from the U.S. Small Business Administration,
the Vermont Small Business Development Center, the U.S. Department of
Agriculture, regional development corporations, regional planning
commissions, the Vermont Housing and Conservation Board, the Vermont
VT LEG #390172 v.1

No. 128 Page 3 of 32
2026
Professionals of Color Network, the Vermont Small Business Law Center, the
Vermont Sustainable Jobs Fund, the Vermont Employee Ownership Center, a
regional community action agency, postsecondary institutions, and local and
regional chambers of commerce.
(c) Report. On or before December 15, 2026, the Commissioner shall
submit a written report to the House Committee on Commerce and Economic
Development and the Senate Committee on Economic Development, Housing
and General Affairs with the Commissioner’s findings pursuant to the business
resources and growth study set forth in this section along with any
recommendations for legislative action and a list of the stakeholders consulted
pursuant to subsection (b) of this section.
* * * Convention Center Task Force * * *
Sec. 8. 2025 Acts and Resolves No. 65, Sec. 3 is amended to read:
Sec. 3. TASK FORCE TO EXPLORE DEVELOPMENT OF
CONVENTION CENTER AND PERFORMANCE VENUE
* * *
(b) Membership. The Task Force shall be composed of the following
members:
(1) one current member of the House of Representatives, who shall be
appointed by the Speaker of the House;
(2) one current member of the Senate, who shall be appointed by the
Committee on Committees;
VT LEG #390172 v.1

No. 128 Page 4 of 32
2026
(3) the Commissioner of the Department of Economic Development or
designee;
(4) the President of the Vermont Chamber of Commerce or designee;
(5) the Chief Executive Officer of the Lake Champlain Chamber of
Commerce or designee;
(6) the President of the Vermont Regional Development Corporations or
designee; and
(7) the Chair of the Vermont Association of Planning and Development
Agencies or designee; and
(8) the President of the University of Vermont or designee.
* * *
(e) Reports. On or before November 1, 2025, the Task Force shall submit
an interim report to the House Committee on Commerce and Economic
Development and the Senate Committee on Economic Development, Housing
and General Affairs with an update on its work pursuant to subsection (c) of
this section. On or before November December 1, 2026, the Task Force shall
submit a final written report to the House Committee on Commerce and
Economic Development and the Senate Committee on Economic
Development, Housing and General Affairs with its findings and any
recommendations for legislative action.
(f) Meetings.
* * *
VT LEG #390172 v.1

No. 128 Page 5 of 32
2026
(4) The Task Force shall cease to exist on December 1, 2026 July 1,
2027.
(5) The Task Force shall meet not more than six times.
(g) Reimbursement.
(1) For attendance at meetings during adjournment of the General
Assembly, a legislative member of the Task Force serving in the member’s
capacity as a legislator shall be entitled to per diem compensation and
reimbursement of expenses pursuant to 2 V.S.A. § 23 for not more than six 14
meetings. These payments shall be made from monies appropriated to the
General Assembly.
(2) Other members of the Task Force shall be entitled to reimbursement
of expenses as permitted under 32 V.S.A. § 1010 for not more than six 14
meetings. These payments shall be made from monies appropriated to the
Agency of Commerce and Community Development.
* * *
* * * Repeal of VEGI Prospective Repeal * * *
Sec. 9. 2016 Acts and Resolves No. 157, Sec. H.12, as amended by 2022 Acts
and Resolves No. 164, Sec. 5, 2023 Acts and Resolves No. 72, Sec. 39, and
2024 Acts and Resolves No. 176, Sec. 1, is further amended to read:
Sec. H.12. VEGI; REPEAL OF AUTHORITY TO AWARD
INCENTIVES
VT LEG #390172 v.1

No. 128 Page 6 of 32
2026
Notwithstanding any provision of law to the contrary, the Vermont
Economic Progress Council shall not accept or approve an application for a
Vermont Employment Growth Incentive under 32 V.S.A. chapter 105,
subchapter 2 on or after January 1, 2027. [Repealed.]
* * * VEGI Annual Cap * * *
Sec. 9a. 32 V.S.A. § 3342 is amended to read:
§ 3342. ANNUAL PROGRAM CAP
(a) In each calendar year the Vermont Economic Progress Council may
approve one or more incentives under this subchapter, the total value of which
shall not exceed:
(1) $15,000,000.00 $10,000,000.00 for one or more initial approvals;
and
(2) $10,000,000.00 $5,000,000.00 for one or more final approvals.
(b) The Council may increase the cap imposed in subdivision (a)(2) of this
section by not more than $5,000,000.00 upon application by the Governor to,
and approval of, the Joint Fiscal Committee.
(c) In evaluating the Governor’s request, the Committee shall consider the
economic and fiscal condition of the State, including recent revenue forecasts
and budget projections.
(d) The Council shall provide the Committee with testimony,
documentation, company-specific data, and any other information the
VT LEG #390172 v.1

No. 128 Page 7 of 32
2026
Committee requests to demonstrate that increasing the cap will create an
opportunity for return on investment to the State.
Sec. 10. [Deleted.]
* * * Study of Culinary and Hospitality Education * * *
Sec. 10a. CULINARY AND HOSPITALITY EDUCATION; STUDY;
REPORT
(a) Purpose and findings. The State of Vermont lost a significant
contributor to its culinary and hospitality workforce pipeline when the New
England Culinary Institute closed during the COVID-19 pandemic. The
General Assembly finds that the establishment of postsecondary educational
programs in the fields of culinary arts and hospitality is critical for the long-
term workforce needs in those sectors and for the economic health of the State.
(b) Task. The Department of Labor, in collaboration with the Vermont
Chamber of Commerce, shall engage with the stakeholders set forth in
subsection (c) of this section to determine how best to develop postsecondary
educational programs in the fields of culinary arts and hospitality by:
(1) investigating suitable locations that could host the programs;
(2) researching and identifying possible educational and business
models;
(3) identifying organizations that could stand up, administer, or operate
the programs;
VT LEG #390172 v.1

No. 128 Page 8 of 32
2026
(4) gauging the interest from private investors to determine whether
there is interest in private funding for the programs;
(5) establishing relationships with culinary and hospitality businesses in
Vermont that have or will have workforce needs;
(6) cataloging opportunities currently available for culinary and
hospitality training and certification;
(7) determining whether there are gaps in the availability of culinary and
hospitality training and certification programs; and
(8) conducting any additional research or outreach that would promote
the development of the programs.
(c) Stakeholders. The Department shall consult and convene with
stakeholders to assist in its work pursuant to subsection (b) of this section that
have relevant experience in the food and hospitality sectors, including
representation from the State Workforce Development Board, Office of
Workforce Strategy and Development, Vermont Association of Career and
Technical Directors, Vermont Professionals of Color, Vermont Independent
Restaurants, Vermont Specialty Foods Association, Vermont Lodging
Association, University of Vermont, Vermont State Colleges System, Vermont
Sustainable Jobs Fund, Vermont Employee Ownership Center, and an
institutional food and beverage provider.
(d) Report. On or before December 1, 2026, the Department shall submit a
written report to the House Committee on Commerce and Economic
VT LEG #390172 v.1

No. 128 Page 9 of 32
2026
Development and the Senate Committee on Economic Development, Housing
and General Affairs with its findings and information gathered pursuant to
subsection (b) of this section along with any recommendations concerning the
development of postsecondary educational programs for culinary arts and
hospitality. The report shall also list the stakeholders consulted pursuant to
subsection (c) of this section.
* * * Culinary Apprenticeship Pilot Program * * *
Sec. 10b. HOSPITALITY AND CULINARY APPRENTICESHIP PILOT;
REPORT
(a) Creation and purpose; coordination.
(1) The Department of Labor, through the Vermont Registered
Apprenticeship Program, shall establish and maintain a two-year hospitality
and culinary apprenticeship pilot that develops and evaluates a new registered
apprenticeship training program specific to accommodation and food services.
The pilot shall be structured as a regional, multi-employer model, with the goal
of the program being to strengthen workforce pathways and improve job
quality in the hospitality and culinary services, which have been identified as
priority sectors by the State Workforce Development Board.
(2) The Department shall coordinate its work on the pilot with the
Department of Tourism and Marketing, Department of Economic
Development, Office of Workforce Strategy and Development, and Vermont
Chamber of Commerce.
VT LEG #390172 v.1

No. 128 Page 10 of 32
2026
(b) Pilot details.
(1) The Department shall:
(A) implement the pilot in a hospitality-based regional economy and
include multiple employers, including at least one large employer, located
within the same regional economy;
(B) incorporate an intermediary or coordinating entity;
(C) include structured work-based learning across more than one
employer;
(D) align with education and training providers, including secondary
and adult career technical education programs;
(E) be structured to rely on existing resources, including the physical
assets of schools, technical centers, and restaurants;
(F) be built around not more than two apprenticeable occupations, as
that term is defined in 21 V.S.A. § 1111(4); and
(G) establish specific numeric targets and track outcomes including
completion, retention, and wage progression.
(2) The pilot shall be designed to achieve, at minimum:
(A) participation of multiple employers;
(B) enrollment of at least one apprentice cohort; and
(C) measurable completion outcomes.
VT LEG #390172 v.1

No. 128 Page 11 of 32
2026
(c) Funding. The Department shall implement the pilot using existing State
and federal funds to the extent practicable and may seek additional grants or
funding as such funds become available.
(d) Report. The Department shall, based on its work on the hospitality and
culinary apprenticeship pilot set forth in this section, submit to the House
Committee on Commerce and Economic Development and the Senate
Committee on Economic Development, Housing and General Affairs:
(1) on or before December 15, 2026, an interim written report on the
progress of the pilot program that includes the design, participation, and
preliminary results of the pilot; and
(2) on or before December 15, 2028, a final written report on the pilot
program, including outcomes, evaluation of effectiveness, and
recommendations for future legislative action.
Sec. 11. [Deleted.]
Sec. 12. [Deleted.]
* * * Rural Industry Development Grant Program * * *
Sec. 12a. 2023 Acts and Resolves No. 78, Sec. F.8 is amended to read:
Sec. F.8 RURAL INDUSTRY DEVELOPMENT GRANT PROGRAM
(a) Creation; purpose.
(1) A Rural Industry Development Grant Program is created within the
Agency of Commerce and Community Development to provide grant funding
through local development corporations for business relocation and expansion
VT LEG #390172 v.1

No. 128 Page 12 of 32
2026
efforts, including the purchase, demolition, and renovation of property for
industrial use.
(2)(A) To the extent funding is appropriated, the Agency shall make
grants through the Program to assist local development corporations with
business relocation and expansion efforts throughout Vermont.
(B) The Agency shall ensure an accounting of the respective State
and Grantee shares of investment in any property be maintained to refund to
the State an appropriate share of any net proceeds resulting from future sale or
transfer of such property acquired or improved through a grant awarded under
this program.
(b) Grant considerations. In making grant awards, the Agency shall
consider:
(1) the real estate needs of growing and relocating businesses, including
nonprofit organizations, in the applicant’s region;
(2) the ability of the proposed project to meet the site-specific needs of
businesses considering whether to expand or locate in this State;
(3) the funding that the applicant has identified, or secured, to leverage a
grant award; and
(4) the readiness of an applicant to move a project forward.
(c) Eligible applicants; priority.
VT LEG #390172 v.1

No. 128 Page 13 of 32
2026
(1) To be eligible for a grant, an applicant must be a local development
corporation, as defined in subdivision 212(10) of this title, located within this
State.
(2) The Secretary of Commerce and Community Development may
designate projects and agreements as first priority based on rural communities
that continue to experience insufficient economic and grand list growth.
(d) Eligible activities. A grant recipient may use funding for the following:
(1) to purchase land for potential industrial use;
(2) for the costs of site development, permitting, or providing
infrastructure for property the recipient owns;
(3) for the equity investment required for a loan transaction through the
Vermont Economic Development Authority under 10 V.S.A. chapter 12,
subchapter 3; or
(4) for the matching requirement of another State or federal grant
consistent with this section.
(e) Application; market assessment.
(1) An applicant shall include in its application a local and regional
market assessment that demonstrates reasonable need for the proposed
development and identifies imminent, potential, or existing business growth
opportunities.
(2) An applicant shall submit the following to demonstrate a readiness to
begin and complete the proposed project:
VT LEG #390172 v.1

No. 128 Page 14 of 32
2026
(A) community and regional support for the project;
(B) that grant funding is needed to complete the proposed project;
(C) an ability to manage the project, with requisite experience and a
plan for fiscal viability; and
(D) a description of the permitting required to proceed with the
project and a plan for obtaining the permits.
(f) Awards; amount.
(1) An award shall not exceed the lesser of $1,000,000 or 20 percent of
the total project cost.
(2) A recipient may combine grant funds with funding from other
sources.
(3) The Agency shall release grant funds upon determining that the
applicant has met all application conditions and requirements.
(4) A grant recipient may apply for additional grant funds if future
amounts are appropriated for the Program and the funds are for a separate but
eligible use.
(g) Deed restrictions; property sales. The Agency shall include deed
restrictions that require the return of the principal amount to the state and may
require the payment of a percentage of the sales profit. [Repealed.]
Sec. 12b. 10 V.S.A. § 6 is added to read:
§ 6. RURAL INDUSTRY DEVELOPMENT GRANT PROGRAM
(a) Creation; purpose.
VT LEG #390172 v.1

No. 128 Page 15 of 32
2026
(1) The Rural Industry Development Grant Program is created within
the Agency of Commerce and Community Development to provide grant
funding through local development corporations for the purpose of business
relocation and expansion activities set forth in subsection (d) of this section.
(2) To the extent funding is appropriated, the Agency shall make grants
through the Program fund to assist local development corporations with
business relocation and expansion efforts throughout Vermont.
(3) As used in this section, “federally impacted property” means real
property that is:
(A) owned by the United States or by any federal agency or an
instrumentality thereof; or
(B) under the custody or control of a federally appointed receiver,
trustee, or conservator, and includes property subject to federal court
jurisdiction.
(b) Grant considerations. In making grant awards, the Agency shall
consider:
(1) the real estate needs of growing and relocating businesses, including
nonprofit organizations, in the applicant’s region;
(2) the ability of the proposed project to meet the site-specific needs of
businesses considering whether to expand or locate in this State;
(3) the funding that the applicant has identified, or secured, to leverage a
grant award; and
VT LEG #390172 v.1

No. 128 Page 16 of 32
2026
(4) the readiness of an applicant to move a project forward.
(c) Eligible applicants; priority.
(1) To be eligible for a grant, an applicant must be a local development
corporation, as defined in subdivision 212(10) of this title, located within this
State.
(2) The Secretary of Commerce and Community Development may
designate projects and agreements as first priority based on rural communities
that continue to experience insufficient economic and grand list growth.
(d) Eligible activities. A grant recipient shall use any funding provided
through this section only for the following:
(1) to purchase real property for potential industrial, commercial, or, in
the case of a federally impacted property, residential use;
(2) for the costs of site development, permitting, or providing
infrastructure for property the recipient owns;
(3) for a project that supports future commercial or industrial
development as outlined in a development agreement;
(4) for the equity investment required for a loan transaction through the
Vermont Economic Development Authority under 10 V.S.A. chapter 12,
subchapter 3;
(5) for the matching requirement of another State or federal grant
consistent with this section; or
VT LEG #390172 v.1

No. 128 Page 17 of 32
2026
(6) for the purchasing, holding, and renovation of property for the
repurposing or redevelopment of a federally impacted property.
(e) Application; market assessment.
(1) An applicant shall include in its application a local and regional
market assessment that demonstrates reasonable need for the proposed
development and identifies imminent, potential, or existing business growth
opportunities.
(2) An applicant shall submit the following to demonstrate a readiness to
begin and complete the proposed project:
(A) community and regional support for the project;
(B) that grant funding is needed to complete the proposed project;
(C) an ability to manage the project, with requisite experience and a
plan for fiscal viability; and
(D) a description of the permitting required to proceed with the
project and a plan for obtaining the permits.
(f) Awards; amount.
(1)(A) An award shall not exceed the lesser of $1,000,000.00 or 50
percent of the total project cost, subject to the exception in subdivision (B) of
this subdivision (1).
(B) An award may exceed $1,000,000.00 but shall not exceed
$2,000,000.00 if the property is classified as a federally impacted property and
the Secretary certifies that the project is located in:
VT LEG #390172 v.1

No. 128 Page 18 of 32
2026
(i) a designated downtown development district; and
(ii) a rural economic area partnership program (REAP Zone); or
(iii) a federally declared natural disaster area, provided the
declaration was made not more than five years from the application date.
(2) A recipient may combine grant funds with funding from other
sources.
(3) The Agency shall release grant funds upon determining that the
applicant has met all application conditions and requirements.
(4) A grant recipient may apply for additional grant funds if future
amounts are appropriated for the Program and the funds are for a separate but
eligible use.
(g) Deed restrictions. Any deed restriction requiring a Rural Industry
Development Grant Program award recipient to return to the State the principal
amount of the grant or a percentage of the sales profit is void and shall not be
enforced.
Sec. 12c. INTENT AND RETROACTIVITY
The intent of Secs. 12a and 12b of this act is to move the Rural Industry
Development Grant Program from its original placement in 2023 Acts and
Resolves No. 78, Sec. F.8 to Title 10 of the Vermont Statutes Annotated. The
move is intended to increase the visibility of the Program. Any person that
was awarded a grant through the Program before the effective date of this act
shall:
VT LEG #390172 v.1

No. 128 Page 19 of 32
2026
(1) not have its award rescinded solely due to the Program language
being moved to Title 10;
(2) if the award has not been fully paid out, be eligible to have the
applicant’s invoices that are submitted on or after the effective date of this act
to the Agency reimbursed at a rate of 50 percent; and
(3) not be eligible for an increased total award amount.
Sec. 13. [Deleted.]
* * * Nickel Rounding * * *
Sec. 13a. PURPOSE
The purpose of Sec. 13b of this act is to authorize the rounding of cash
transactions to the nearest five cents where one-cent coins are unavailable or
impractical, while ensuring legal clarity and consumer fairness.
Sec. 13b. 9 V.S.A. chapter 1 is amended to read:
CHAPTER 1. MONEY OF ACCOUNT
§ 1. DOLLAR, CENT, AND MILL
The money of account in the State shall be the dollar, cent, and mill; and
accounts in public offices and proceedings in court shall be in conformity
herewith; but this section shall not affect an account, charge, or entry originally
made or a contract expressed in other money of account, but the same shall be
reduced to dollars and parts of a dollar in an action thereon.
§ 2. NICKEL ROUNDING; AUTHORIZED
(a) Definitions. As used in this section:
VT LEG #390172 v.1

No. 128 Page 20 of 32
2026
(1) “Cash” means coins or paper currency of the United States offered in
physical form.
(2) “Cash transaction” means a sale of goods or services where payment
is made entirely or partially in cash.
(3) “Rounding” means adjusting the final total amount due, after taxes
and fees, to the nearest five-cent increment.
(b) Rounding authorization.
(1) A person engaged in a cash transaction may round the final amount
due to the nearest $0.05 as follows:
(A) If the final digit of the amount due is $0.01, $0.02, $0.06, or
$0.07, rounded down to the nearest amount divisible by five.
(B) If the final digit of the amount due is $0.03, $0.04, $0.08, or
$0.09, rounded up to the nearest amount divisible by five.
(2) If a person rounds a cash transaction under this section, any cash
refund of the amount paid shall be issued to the purchaser in the exact amount
initially paid for the goods or service.
(c) Exclusions. This section shall not apply to:
(1) electronic and other noncash payments;
(2) payment of wages as that term is defined in 21 V.S.A. § 341;
(3) rebates or cash disbursements; and
(4) transactions governed by federal law that prohibits rounding.
VT LEG #390172 v.1

No. 128 Page 21 of 32
2026
(d) Application. Notwithstanding any law to the contrary, rounding under
this section shall not constitute an unlawful price increase, surcharge, unfair or
deceptive act or practice in commerce, or discrimination.
(e) Notice requirements.
(1) On or before July 1, 2026, the Commissioner of Liquor and Lottery
shall prepare and provide individuals and businesses with a model notice
pursuant to this section that shall also include a reference to the Vermont
Consumer Assistance Program.
(2) A person rounding transactions under this section shall post the
model notice developed pursuant to subdivision (1) of this subsection in a clear
and conspicuous manner at the point of sale or at the entrance to the business.
(3) The Secretary of Agriculture, Food and Markets may issue a penalty
for the failure to provide the notice required under this subsection in
accordance with 6 V.S.A. § 687.
(f) Taxes and fees. All taxes and fees shall be calculated and remitted
based on the prerounding amount.
Sec. 14. [Deleted.]
* * * C-PACE Program * * *
Sec. 14a. 24 V.S.A. chapter 87, subchapter 3 is added to read:
Subchapter 3. Commercial Property-Assessed Clean Energy
§ 3275. COMMERCIAL PROPERTY-ASSESSED CLEAN ENERGY
DISTRICTS; APPROVAL OF LEGISLATIVE BODY
VT LEG #390172 v.1

No. 128 Page 22 of 32
2026
(a) The legislative body of a town, city, or incorporated village may vote to
designate the municipality as a commercial property-assessed clean energy
district or C-PACE district. In a district, only those property owners who have
entered into written agreements with the municipality under section 3276 of
this title would be subject to a special assessment, as set forth in section 3255
of this title.
(b) Upon a vote of approval by a majority of the legislative body of the
municipality voting at a duly warned meeting, the municipality shall allow for
the imposition of a special assessment to secure private financing for property
owners of commercial or industrial buildings within the boundaries of the
municipality for renewable energy projects as defined in 30 V.S.A. § 8002(17),
energy efficiency projects as defined by section 3267 of this title, water
conservation projects, and resiliency improvement projects.
(c) As used in this subchapter:
(1) “Commercial or industrial building” means any building other than a
residential dwelling with fewer than five units.
(2) “District” means a commercial property-assessed clean energy
district which includes the entire municipality.
(3) “Resilience” means the ability of interconnected ecological, social,
physical, and economic systems to anticipate, adapt, withstand, respond, and
thrive in the face of current and future conditions and disasters.
VT LEG #390172 v.1

No. 128 Page 23 of 32
2026
(4) “Resiliency improvement” means improvements that increase the
resilience of a property, including air quality and stormwater infrastructure
improvements, snow and flood mitigation, energy storage and microgrids,
alternative vehicle charging infrastructure, and fire and wind resistance.
(5) “Water conservation improvement” means measures, equipment, or
devices that decrease the consumption of or demand for water, address safe
drinking water, or eliminate lead from water used for drinking or cooking.
§ 3276. WRITTEN AGREEMENTS; CONSENT OF PROPERTY
OWNERS; ENERGY SAVINGS ANALYSIS; LENDER CONSENT
(a) Upon an affirmative vote made pursuant to section 3275 of this title and
the performance of an analysis pursuant to subsection (b) of this section, an
owner of a commercial or industrial building, within the boundaries of a
district, may enter into a written agreement with the municipality that shall
constitute the owner’s consent to be subject to a special assessment, as set forth
in section 3255 of this title.
(b) Prior to entering into a written agreement, a property owner shall have
an analysis performed that includes the following components:
(1) where energy or water usage improvements are proposed, an energy
analysis by a licensed professional engineer or engineering firm stating that the
proposed qualified improvements will result in either more efficient use or
conservation of energy or water, the reduction of greenhouse gas emissions, or
the addition of renewable sources of energy or water;
VT LEG #390172 v.1

No. 128 Page 24 of 32
2026
(2) where renewable energy is proposed, an engineering study showing
that the improvements are feasible;
(3) where resiliency improvements are proposed, certification by a
licensed professional engineer stating that the qualified improvements will
result in improved resilience; or
(4) for new construction, certification by a licensed professional
engineer or engineering firm stating that the proposed qualified improvements
will enable the project to meet or exceed the energy efficiency or water
efficiency or renewable energy or water usage requirements of the current
building code and the Commercial Building Energy Standards established
under 30 V.S.A. § 53.
(c) A written agreement shall provide that:
(1) The length of time allowed for the property owner to repay the
assessment shall not exceed the life expectancy of the improvement. In
instances where multiple improvements have been installed, the length of time
shall not exceed the average lifetime of all improvements, weighted by cost.
(2) Notwithstanding any other provision of law:
(A) A lien under this section:
(i) is a first and prior lien on the property, subordinate only to a
lien for property taxes, from the date on which the notice of special assessment
is recorded until the assessment, interest, or penalty is paid; and
VT LEG #390172 v.1

No. 128 Page 25 of 32
2026
(ii) runs with the land, and that portion of the assessment under the
assessment contract that is not yet due shall not be accelerated or extinguished
by foreclosure of a property tax lien or any other foreclosure.
(B) In the event of a foreclosure action, all payments on an
assessment under this subchapter that are due and unpaid as of the date the
action is filed, and all payments on the assessment that become due after that
date and that accrue up to and including the date title to the property is
transferred to the mortgage holder, the lienholder, or a third party in the
foreclosure action shall be paid in order for title to transfer.
(3) A capital provider shall disclose to participating property owners
each of the following:
(A) the risks associated with participating in the program, including
risks related to the failure of participating property owners to make payments
and the risk of foreclosure; and
(B) the provisions of subsection (h) of this section that pertain to
prepayment of the assessment.
(d) The notice of an agreement shall include at least each of the following:
(1) the name of the property owner as grantor;
(2) the name of the municipality as grantee;
(3) the date of the agreement;
(4) a legal description of the real property against which the assessment
is made pursuant to the agreement;
VT LEG #390172 v.1

No. 128 Page 26 of 32
2026
(5) the amount of the assessment and the period during which the
assessment will be made on the property;
(6) a statement that the assessment will remain a lien on the property
until paid in full or released; and
(7) the location at which the original agreement may be examined.
(e) Prior to entering into the written assessment contract, the property
owner shall obtain and furnish to the municipality a written statement,
executed by each holder of a mortgage or deed of trust on the property
securing indebtedness, in their sole and absolute discretion, that consents to the
assessment and indicates that the assessment does not constitute an event of
default under the mortgage or deed of trust.
(f) The combined amount of the assessment plus any outstanding mortgage
obligations for the property shall not exceed 90 percent of the appraised real
property value of that property, as stabilized or as complete.
(g) With respect to an agreement under this section:
(1) the assessments to be repaid under the agreement, when calculated
as if they were the repayment of a loan, shall not violate 9 V.S.A. §§ 41a, 43,
44, and 46–50; and
(2) the maximum length of time for the owner to repay the assessment
shall not exceed 30 years.
(h) For projects under subchapter 2 of this chapter, there shall be no penalty
or premium for prepayment of the outstanding balance of an assessment under
VT LEG #390172 v.1

No. 128 Page 27 of 32
2026
this subchapter if the balance is prepaid in full. Projects under this subchapter
3 are not subject to these provisions, but shall be subject to the private
agreement for the financing of improvements.
(i) Property may be eligible for financing if otherwise qualified
improvements were completed and operational not more than 36 months prior
to submission of the application to the Program. Waivers to the 36-month
requirement may be granted in the sole discretion of the program
administrator.
(j) This section shall not be construed to affect a taxpayer’s liability, or
municipality’s responsibility for payment, under 32 V.S.A. § 5402.
§ 3277. PROGRAM ADMINISTRATORS
(a) An entity that administers the commercial property-assessed clean
energy program or C-PACE Program under this subchapter shall be referred to
as a program administrator. A municipality, a public agency, or a private
entity may serve as a program administrator.
(b) A municipality that has adopted a C-PACE district may:
(1) enter into a contract with an entity to serve as the program
administrator and to administer the functions of the C-PACE Program for the
municipality; or
(2) serve as the program administrator itself, to administer the functions
of a C-PACE Program, including entering into C-PACE agreements with
VT LEG #390172 v.1

No. 128 Page 28 of 32
2026
commercial property owners in its jurisdiction and collecting C-PACE
assessments.
(c) An entity may:
(1) enter into a contract with a C-PACE municipality where the entity
shall serve as the program administrator in the municipality; and
(2) collect fees necessary to administer the C-PACE Program.
(d) Other than the fulfillment of its obligations specified in a C-PACE
agreement, neither the program administrator nor a municipality has any
liability to a commercial property owner for or related to energy savings or
resiliency improvements financed under a C-PACE Program.
Sec. 14b. 24 V.S.A. § 3263 is amended to read:
§ 3263. COSTS OF OPERATION OF DISTRICT
The owners of real property who have entered into written agreements with
the municipality under section 3262 of this title shall be obligated to cover the
costs of operating the district. A municipality may use other available funds to
operate the district. A municipality may charge fees to cover the operation of
the C-PACE Program under subchapter 3 of this chapter.
Sec. 14c. 24 V.S.A. § 3264 is amended to read:
§ 3264. RIGHTS OF PROPERTY OWNERS
A property owner who has entered into a written agreement with the
municipality under section 3262 or section 3276 of this title may enter into a
private agreement for the installation or construction of a project relating to
VT LEG #390172 v.1

No. 128 Page 29 of 32
2026
renewable energy, as defined in 30 V.S.A. § 8002(17), relating to resiliency
improvements as defined in section 3275 of this title, or relating to energy
efficiency as defined in section 3267 of this title.
Sec. 14d. 24 V.S.A. § 3265 is amended to read:
§ 3265. LIABILITY OF MUNICIPALITY
(a) A municipality that incurs indebtedness for or otherwise finances
projects under this subchapter shall not be liable for the failure of performance
of a project.
(b) A municipality that incurs indebtedness for bonding under this
subchapter shall pledge the full faith and credit of the municipality.
(c) A municipality that enters into a written agreement with a property
owner under subchapter 3 of this chapter shall not incur any indebtedness or
otherwise finance projects under this chapter, nor shall be liable for the failure
of the performance of a project, nor shall pledge the full faith and credit of the
municipality.
Sec. 14e. 24 V.S.A. § 3268 is amended to read:
§ 3268. RELEASE OF LIEN
(a) A municipality shall release a participating property owner of the lien
on the property against which the assessment under this subchapter or
subchapter 3 of this chapter is made upon full payment of the value of the
assessment.
VT LEG #390172 v.1

No. 128 Page 30 of 32
2026
(b) Notice of a release of a lien for an assessment under this subchapter or
subchapter 3 of this chapter shall be filed with the clerk of the applicable
municipality for recording in the land records of that municipality.
Sec. 14f. 24 V.S.A. § 3255 is amended to read:
§ 3255. COLLECTION OF ASSESSMENTS; LIENS
(a) Special assessments under this chapter shall constitute a lien on the
property against which the assessment is made in the same manner and to the
same extent as taxes assessed on the grand list of a municipality, and all
procedures and remedies for the collection of taxes shall apply to special
assessments.
(b) Notwithstanding subsection (a) of this section, a lien for an assessment
under subchapter 2 of this chapter shall be subordinate to all liens on the
property in existence at the time the lien for the assessment is filed on in the
land records, shall be subordinate to a first mortgage on the property recorded
after such filing, and shall be superior to any other lien on the property
recorded after such filing. In no way shall this subsection affect the status or
priority of any municipal lien other than a lien for an assessment under
subchapter 2 of this chapter. A lien for an assessment under subchapter 3 of
this chapter shall be exempt from the provisions of this section and, upon
receipt of consent from lenders, pursuant to subsection 3276(e) of this title,
shall not be subordinate to all liens on the property in existence at the time the
lien for the assessment is filed in the land records.
VT LEG #390172 v.1

No. 128 Page 31 of 32
2026
Sec. 14g. 9 V.S.A. § 46 is amended to read:
§ 46. EXCEPTIONS
Section 43 of this title, relating to deposit requirements, and section 45 of
this title, relating to prepayment penalties, shall not apply and the parties may
contract for a rate of interest in excess of the rate provided in section 41a of
this title in the case of:
(1) obligations of corporations, including municipal and nonprofit
corporations; or
(2) obligations incurred by any person, partnership, association, or other
entity to finance in whole or in part income-producing business or activity, but
not including obligations incurred to finance family dwellings of four units or
fewer when used as a residence by the borrower or to finance real estate that is
devoted to agricultural purposes as part of an operating farming unit when used
as a residence by the borrower; or
(3) obligations to finance the purchase, construction, or improvement of
property for seasonal or part-time occupancy and not as a place of legal
residence; or
(4) obligations guaranteed or insured by the United States of America or
any agency thereof; or
(5) obligations incurred for commercial property-assessed clean energy
projects pursuant to 24 V.S.A. chapter 87, subchapter 3.
VT LEG #390172 v.1

No. 128 Page 32 of 32
2026
* * * Effective Date * * *
Sec. 15. EFFECTIVE DATE
This act shall take effect on passage.
Date Governor signed bill: June 8, 2026
VT LEG #390172 v.1